New York, session 2025-2026, A2567.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act enacts into law major components of legislation 2 which are necessary to implement the New York healthy incentive program. 3 Each component is wholly contained within a Part identified as Parts A 4 through C. The effective date for each particular provision contained 5 within such Part is set forth in the last section of such Part. Any 6 provision in any section contained within a Part, including the effec- 7 tive date of the Part, which makes a reference to a section "of this 8 act", when used in connection with that particular component, shall be 9 deemed to mean and refer to the corresponding section of the Part in 10 which it is found. Section three of this act sets forth the general 11 effective date of this act. 12 PART A 13 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 14 95-b to read as follows: 15 § 95-b. New York healthy incentive program (NYHIP). 1. Legislative 16 findings. The legislature hereby finds and declares that healthy food 17 incentive programs provide significant health, educational, social, and 18 economic benefits to the general public, especially for those individ- 19 uals who have historically been excluded from access to fresh produce; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03901-01-5 A. 2567 2 1 in food deserts where access to healthy and affordable food is limited 2 or where there are no grocery stores; and local farmers who struggle to 3 compete with imported goods and produce. Furthermore, it is the artic- 4 ulated public policy of this state to promote and foster growth in the 5 number of farm to consumer entities accepting supplemental nutrition 6 assistance benefits and participate in the healthy food incentive 7 program. The healthy food incentive program provides earned dollars for 8 supplemental nutrition assistance program recipients to spend on local 9 healthy food that is fresh and nutritious for those who may be unable to 10 readily afford or have easy access to fresh fruits and vegetables for 11 themselves or their families; promotes healthier individual lifestyles 12 by incentivizing better eating habits; fosters the retention and expan- 13 sion of farm to consumer entities, particularly in food insecure envi- 14 ronments; engenders a closer relationship between communities and local 15 farmers; increases capacity for local farms; and stimulates local econo- 16 mies. It is therefore the intent of the legislature and the purpose of 17 this section to create a state operated healthy food incentive program, 18 known as the New York healthy incentive program (NYHIP), for all SNAP 19 recipients and local economies across the state. 20 2. Definitions. For the purposes of this section and section ninety- 21 five-c of this title: 22 a. "Office" shall mean the office of temporary and disability assist- 23 ance. 24 b. "Commissioner" shall mean the commissioner of the office of tempo- 25 rary and disability assistance. 26 c. "Farm to consumer entities" shall mean any sort of enterprise that 27 allows local farmers to sell their produce and other products directly 28 to the consumer, such as farmers markets, co-ops, locally sourced commu- 29 nity owned grocery stores, and community supported agriculture, as 30 determined by the commissioner with input from the commissioner of agri- 31 culture and markets. 32 d. "Local" or "locally" shall mean located within the state of New 33 York, however, if neighboring states create their own healthy incentive 34 programs the office may make agreements of reciprocity to allow SNAP 35 beneficiaries to earn dollar rewards for the purchase of healthy foods 36 from such neighboring state and may place a boundary limitation based on 37 distance from state lines. 38 e. "Local healthy food" shall mean any agricultural product that 39 provides nutritional support to humans such as produce, dairy, meat and 40 processed foods that must consist of ingredients that are grown and 41 cultivated in the state of New York, but may be processed elsewhere. For 42 the purposes of this paragraph, "processed foods" shall mean any raw 43 agricultural commodities that have been milled, cut, chopped, heated, 44 pasteurized, blanched, cooked, canned, frozen, dried, dehydrated, or 45 mixed, and shall consist of at least seventy-five percent of local 46 ingredients. 47 f. "Similarly situated entities" shall mean stores of any size that 48 have agreed to and signed a memorandum of understanding detailing how 49 they will prioritize sourcing produce and other healthy foods locally, 50 agree to goal metrics to increase their ability to locally source, and 51 meet those metrics to maintain their healthy food incentive program 52 participation. For the purposes of this paragraph, "stores" shall mean 53 any not farm to consumer produce retailer that is currently authorized 54 as an electronic benefit transfer retailer, such as grocery stores, 55 corner stores, bodegas, food marts, food stores, convenience stores, or 56 markets. A. 2567 3 1 g. "SNAP card" or "SNAP benefit card" shall mean any electronic method 2 in which the supplemental nutrition assistance program is administered 3 to beneficiaries on a credit or debit card, including through the elec- 4 tronic benefit transfer system described in section twenty-one-a of this 5 chapter. 6 3. Office powers and duties to promulgate program. a. The office is 7 directed to apply for any necessary grant or waiver to participate in 8 the Gus Schumacher Nutrition Incentive Program or similar grant adminis- 9 tered by the United States Department of Agriculture and the National 10 Institute of Food and Agriculture for approval, and to act for the state 11 in any negotiations relative to the submission and approval of such 12 plan, waiver, or grant, and shall make such arrangements and take such 13 action, not inconsistent with law, as may be required to obtain and 14 retain such approval, to implement such plan, waiver, or grant and to 15 secure for the state the benefits available. 16 b. The office shall actively search for, find and apply for grants and 17 other streams of funding to promulgate this section and fund this 18 program. 19 c. The office shall promulgate rules and regulations and take all 20 other actions necessary for the effective creation and implementation of 21 NYHIP, providing earned dollars for SNAP beneficiaries to spend on local 22 healthy food that is fresh and nutritious, in accordance with this 23 section. Nothing in this section shall prohibit or limit the commis- 24 sioner's ability to expand access to NYHIP to all New Yorkers, so long 25 as it continues to prioritize the earned dollars used to buy locally 26 grown healthy foods. Nothing in this section shall prohibit or limit the 27 office from including New York grown and certified foods, as created by 28 section one hundred fifty-six-h of the agriculture and markets law, from 29 being included in NYHIP. NYHIP shall include the following: 30 i. A fixed earned dollar amount for the purchase of fresh locally 31 grown healthy foods using SNAP; 32 ii. Automation of earned dollar amounts on SNAP cards; 33 iii. Automation of SNAP benefit cards so SNAP beneficiaries are able 34 to participate in local community supported agriculture subscriptions 35 and earn NYHIP dollars; 36 iv. Ensuring NYHIP is available at all farm to consumer entities and 37 similarly situated entities by encouraging them to participate; 38 v. Connecting farm to consumer entities and similarly situated enti- 39 ties with the necessary resources and technology to participate in 40 NYHIP; 41 vi. Regular updates and maintenance of the mobile application and 42 website; and 43 vii. Creation and maintenance of a NYHIP outreach program to ensure 44 all SNAP beneficiaries are aware of the opportunity to participate in 45 such program. 46 d. The office may contract with outside entities to effect the imple- 47 mentation and promulgation of NYHIP and shall give greater weight to 48 entities that manage healthy incentive programs in the state when deter- 49 mining contract award. 50 e. The office shall establish a grant program, for farmers, farmers 51 markets, and community-supported agriculture partnerships, in attaining 52 any technology needed to take payment from SNAP beneficiaries and 53 participate in NYHIP. The office, in consultation with the department of 54 agriculture and markets, shall establish an outreach program for farm- 55 ers, farmers markets, and community-supported agriculture partnerships A. 2567 4 1 to be informed of NYHIP and the availability of the technological grant 2 described above. 3 4. NYHIP mobile application, website and interactive map. a. i. The 4 office shall establish a mobile application and website to promote NYHIP 5 and locations available to SNAP recipients across the state and promote 6 farm to consumer entities that take SNAP. The mobile application and 7 website shall include, but is not limited to: 8 A. Name, location, hours of operation, contact information, and hyper- 9 links, as available, to all farm to consumer entities that sell locally 10 grown healthy food and accept SNAP benefits; and 11 B. Name, location, hours of operation, contact information, and hyper- 12 links, as available, to all farmers markets, mobile markets, community 13 supported agriculture, or similarly situated entities that sell locally 14 grown healthy food that are participants of NYHIP. 15 ii. The mobile application and website should have an interactive map 16 where a user may find farm to consumer entities that take SNAP and are 17 NYHIP participants. This information should also be searchable by 18 town/city, county, region or any other criteria the commissioner deems 19 relevant. 20 iii. The mobile application and website should make clear distinctions 21 between farm to consumer entities that just take SNAP and those that are 22 participants of NYHIP. 23 b. Each commissioner of social services shall provide information 24 regarding NYHIP on their website and hyperlinks to this interactive 25 website and where to download the mobile application on the SNAP pages 26 of all social services websites. 27 c. The office shall establish procedures for farm to consumer entities 28 that accept SNAP benefits and NYHIP to provide the updated information 29 detailed above for the mobile application and website. In developing 30 such procedures, the office shall provide a system in which the informa- 31 tion required in the mobile application and website is updated monthly 32 and continuous maintenance is provided. 33 d. The office shall promulgate rules and regulations and take all 34 other actions necessary for the effective implementation of this 35 section. Nothing in this section shall prohibit or limit the depart- 36 ment's ability to expand access to the NYHIP incentive program map to 37 all New Yorkers. 38 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. 39 PART B 40 Section 1. Section 95 of the social services law is amended by adding 41 a new subdivision 12 to read as follows: 42 12. (a) The office shall promptly seek any necessary approvals from 43 the United States department of agriculture food and nutrition service 44 (USDA) to automate the use of SNAP benefit cards to streamline the proc- 45 ess for potential and current recipients to participate in locally grown 46 fresh food subscription services, such as community supported agricul- 47 ture partnerships, by conducting an automatic deduction on a weekly 48 basis. The office shall also create an automation process for the New 49 York healthy incentive program (NYHIP) as prescribed in section ninety- 50 five-b of this title, by allowing the state to add the accrued incen- 51 tives directly to a SNAP card. Once the office receives the waiver, the 52 office shall work with the USDA and NYHIP to ensure that any incentives 53 accrued are used by SNAP beneficiaries to purchase local food that is 54 fresh and nutritious for those who may be unable to readily afford or A. 2567 5 1 have easy access to fresh fruits and vegetables for themselves or their 2 families. The office shall promptly seek any necessary approvals from 3 the USDA in order to maximize availability of NYHIP purchasing options 4 throughout the state. 5 (b) The office shall ensure SNAP beneficiaries and locally grown fresh 6 food subscription services, such as community supported agriculture 7 partnerships, are held harmless under situations in which SNAP benefici- 8 aries lose benefits during their subscription contract. The office shall 9 honor the entirety of the subscription service contract at the expense 10 of the state. 11 (c) Within one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this 12 subdivision, the office shall apply for a waiver or any other necessary 13 measure to the USDA to automate the use of SNAP in the state to stream- 14 line NYHIP and increase access to locally grown CSA subscriptions. 15 (d) For the purposes of this subdivision, "community supported agri- 16 culture partnerships" or "CSA" shall mean a system that connects farmers 17 and consumers by allowing the consumer to invest in farmers by subscrib- 18 ing to a harvest of a certain farm or group of farms, usually done by 19 crop season but may be year round. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. 21 PART C 22 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 23 95-c to read as follows: 24 § 95-c. New York healthy incentive program (NYHIP) outreach program. 25 1. In accordance with federal requirements and to the extent that 26 federal matching funds are available, the office shall develop and 27 implement an outreach plan to inform low-income households potentially 28 eligible to receive food stamps and participate in NYHIP to encourage 29 the participation of eligible households that wish to participate. 30 2. In developing and implementing such a plan the office is authorized 31 and empowered, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and 32 provided that federal aid is available therefor, to enter into contrac- 33 tual agreements with public and/or private organizations to develop and 34 implement local, regional, and statewide outreach programs. 35 3. Each commissioner of social services shall develop and submit to 36 the office on an annual basis for its approval, a local outreach plan 37 governing the use of local social services personnel and services 38 provided by federally funded and other agencies and organizations to 39 inform potentially eligible households of the availability and benefits 40 of NYHIP and to encourage and facilitate the participation of eligible 41 households. The office shall provide commissioners of social services 42 with technical assistance as needed to carry out the provisions of this 43 subdivision. 44 4. As part of each local outreach plan, social services officials 45 shall take all steps necessary to maintain a supply of information leaf- 46 lets in public buildings, including but not limited to local unemploy- 47 ment insurance and employment services offices of the department of 48 labor, institutions and facilities under the supervision or control of 49 the department of health, food stores, union halls, community centers, 50 entities participating in NYHIP, and local agencies providing services 51 to the elderly to help ensure that eligible persons are informed of the 52 supplemental nutrition assistance program and NYHIP. Additionally, as 53 part of the local outreach plan, social services officials shall ensure 54 that every new supplemental nutrition assistance program applicant A. 2567 6 1 receives information on NYHIP upon submission of an application and 2 shall provide such information in the home language of the applicant 3 pursuant to any federal and state laws, rules and regulations. 4 5. The office shall periodically distribute to all newspapers, and to 5 television and radio stations throughout the state, public service 6 announcements describing NYHIP, including the NYHIP interactive map and 7 website, and shall promptly inform such media of significant changes in 8 the program affecting eligibility requirements and/or the amount of 9 NYHIP earnings. 10 6. The office shall establish procedures in cooperation with the 11 industrial commissioner of the department of labor to ensure that infor- 12 mational leaflets about NYHIP are sent to each local employment services 13 office for distribution pursuant to section five hundred forty of the 14 labor law. Each leaflet shall include, but not be limited to: the phone 15 number for the New York state food stamp hotline; how to access the 16 NYHIP website and interactive map; how SNAP beneficiaries earn NYHIP 17 benefits buying local healthy foods; estimated maximum income eligibil- 18 ity levels by household size for participation in SNAP; and the avail- 19 ability of local social services departments to provide additional 20 information about NYHIP. 21 7. In accordance with applicable federal and state laws, rules and 22 regulations, the office shall make available appropriate translated 23 materials so that potentially eligible non-English speaking individuals 24 may be informed about NYHIP. 25 8. The office shall promulgate rules and regulations and take all 26 other actions necessary for the effective implementation of this 27 section. 28 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. 29 § 2. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi- 30 sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 31 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 32 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 33 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 34 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 35 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 36 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 37 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 38 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 39 the applicable effective date of Parts A through C of this act shall be 40 as specifically set forth in the last section of such Parts.